Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 4-114, as
amended by Section 6, Chapter 6, O.S.L. 2024 (29 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 4-114), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-114. A. All legal residents who have resided in the
state for at least six (6) months and intend to remain residents,
and nonresidents pursuant to the requirements provided in subsection
HB2896 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

J of this section, may purchase lifetime fishing licenses or
lifetime combination hunting and fishing licenses from the State
Wildlife Conservation Director.
B. The fee for these licenses for legal residents shall be:
1. Lifetime fishing license, Three Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($375.00);
2. Lifetime combination hunting and fishing license, One
Thousand Twenty-four Dollars ($1,024.00);
3. Senior citizen lifetime fishing license for persons sixty-
five (65) years of age or older, Thirty Dollars ($30.00); and
4. Senior citizen lifetime combination hunting and fishing
license for persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older, Sixty
Dollars ($60.00).
C. Legal The fee for these licenses for nonresidents shall be:
1. Lifetime fishing license, Three Thousand Dollars
($3,000.00);
2. Lifetime combination hunting and fishing license, Seven
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00);
3. Senior citizen lifetime fishing license for persons sixty-
five (65) years of age or older, Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00); and
4. Senior citizen lifetime combination hunting and fishing
license for persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older, Four
Hundred Dollars ($400.00).

HB2896 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. A resident having proper certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor certifying
that the person is a disabled veteran and registered with the
veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs may purchase a disability lifetime combination hunting and
fishing license from the State Wildlife Conservation Director. The
fees for the license shall be as follows:
1. Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for veterans having a
disability of less than sixty percent (60%); and
2. Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for veterans having a
disability of sixty percent (60%) or more.
D. E. The use of the licenses provided in this section are
subject to those restrictions provided by statute and the
regulations of the Wildlife Conservation Commission. Except as
otherwise provided for in this section, each lifetime hunting
license issued pursuant to subsections B and, C, and D of this
section shall be in lieu of all annual hunting licenses and all
special season permits.
E. F. Should any lifetime license be lost or destroyed, a
duplicate will be issued by the Department of Wildlife Conservation
for a fee not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00).
F. G. A lifetime licensee shall not lose the privileges of such
license by a subsequent transfer of residency.

HB2896 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

G. H. A person who is sixty-four (64) years of age shall be
eligible to purchase a senior citizen lifetime license issued
pursuant to paragraphs 4 through 6 of subsection subsections B and C
of this section during the calendar year in which the person turns
sixty-five (65) years of age.
H. I. The Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall
promulgate any rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
J. The licenses for a nonresident under this section shall be
issued to any nonresident, which shall include the spouse and
children, who are under eighteen (18) years of age, of the
nonresident, who hunts on land he or she owns that:
1. Is a minimum of one hundred sixty (160) acres;
2. Is not owned by a trust, any type of business entity, or by
multiple owners, excluding joint tenants with the right of
survivorship;
3. Has been owned by the nonresident for at least one (1) year;
4. The nonresident has paid property taxes on the land for the
previous year; and
5. The nonresident has shown proof of both ownership and paid
taxes to the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife Conservation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
HB2896 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 02/26/2025 - DO PASS,
As Amended and Coauthored.




















HB2896 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.